Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202584-920
Act, how cited.

Sections 84-901 to 84-920, the Occupational Board Reform Act, and the Personal Privacy Protection Act shall be known and may be cited as the Administrative Procedure Act.

Laws 1987, LB 253, § 22;

Laws 1994, LB 446, § 38;

Laws 1995, LB 490, § 191;

Laws 2005, LB 373, § 8;

Laws 2011, LB617, § 5;

Laws 2016, LB867, § 16;

Laws 2018, LB299, § 20;

Laws 2024, LB43, § 16;

Laws 2025, LB660, § 38.

Occupational Board Reform Act, see section 84-933.

Personal Privacy Protection Act, see section 20-801.